Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Area Development Districts

147A.050.
Area development districts created.

There is hereby created and established in the Commonwealth fifteen (15) area development districts consisting of the following counties:

Purchase Area Development District which shall include the counties of Ballard, Carlisle, Hickman, Fulton, McCracken, Graves, Marshall, and Calloway;

Pennyrile Area Development District which shall include the counties of Livingston, Crittenden, Lyon, Caldwell, Hopkins, Muhlenberg, Trigg, Christian and Todd;

Green River Area Development District which shall include the counties of Union, Henderson, Webster, McLean, Daviess, Ohio and Hancock;

Barren River Area Development District which shall include the counties of Logan, Simpson, Butler, Warren, Edmonson, Hart, Barren, Allen, Metcalfe and Monroe;

Lincoln Trail Area Development District which shall include the counties of Breckinridge, Meade, Grayson, Hardin, Larue, Nelson, Washington, and Marion;

Jefferson Area Development District which shall include the counties of Bullitt, Henry, Jefferson, Oldham, Shelby, Spencer and Trimble;

Northern Kentucky Area Development District which shall include the counties of Boone, Kenton, Campbell, Carroll, Gallatin, Owen, Grant and Pendleton;

Buffalo Trace Area Development District which shall include the counties of Bracken, Mason, Robertson, Fleming and Lewis;

Gateway Area Development District which shall include the counties of Rowan, Bath, Montgomery, Menifee, and Morgan;

Fivco Area Development District which shall include the counties of Greenup, Boyd, Carter, Elliott, and Lawrence;

Big Sandy Area Development District which shall include the counties of Johnson, Magoffin, Martin, Floyd, and Pike;

Kentucky River Area Development District which shall include the counties of Wolfe, Owsley, Lee, Breathitt, Leslie, Perry, Knott, and Letcher;

Cumberland Valley Area Development District which shall include the counties of Jackson, Rockcastle, Laurel, Clay, Knox, Whitley, Bell, and Harlan;

Lake Cumberland Area Development District which shall include the counties of Taylor, Adair, Green, Casey, Russell, Pulaski, Clinton, Cumberland, Wayne, and McCreary; and

Bluegrass Area Development District which shall include the counties of Anderson, Franklin, Woodford, Mercer, Boyle, Lincoln, Garrard, Jessamine, Fayette, Scott, Harrison, Bourbon, Nicholas, Clark, Madison, Powell, and Estill.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 125, § 1.

147A.060.
Board of directors for each district — Appointment — Terms — State officers and members of General Assembly may serve only in advisory capacity.

There shall be in each area development district a board of directors. The composition of the board and the terms and appointments of its members in each district shall be specified by administrative regulation promulgated by the Department for Local Government in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A. The designee of a mayor or county judge/executive shall be a member of the designator’s respective legislative body or their staff. Other persons who are not elected officials or members of their staffs may be designated as representatives with the consent of that body. The Department for Local Government, in specifying the composition of the board, shall conform to applicable federal requirements. A person who is a state officer, a deputy state officer, or a member of the General Assembly may serve only in a nonmember advisory capacity to the board of directors of an area development district. An area development district board of directors shall notify legislators of the provisions of this section and of their right to participate in the activities of the area development district. If a legislator chooses to participate in accordance with this section, the area development district shall send meeting notices to that legislator at the same time board members are notified of the meetings.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 125, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(4); 1978, ch. 155, § 69, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 187, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 69, § 58, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 450, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 47, § 73, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 12, effective July 15, 2010.

147A.070.
Appointment of executive director — Election of executive committee, duties — Advertisement of open positions — Employees’ compensation.

Subject to the requirements of subsection (3) of this section, the board of directors in each district may appoint an executive director and deputy executive director and fix the salary for each position. The executive director shall perform, in the name of the board, such functions and duties and may exercise such authority of the board as the board may delegate to the executive director. The deputy executive director, if one is hired, shall perform such functions and duties as designated by the executive director.

The board of directors in each district may elect from its membership an executive committee and delegate to the committee any of the following duties:

To employ such staff members as may be required for the operations of the district;

To manage the financial assets and obligations of the district;

To guide the activities of the district between meetings of the board; and

To perform such other duties as the board might delegate to it.

On or after June 29, 2017, an open position for the executive director or deputy executive director with an area development district shall be advertised by the board of directors in a manner designed to provide adequate notice of the opening and sufficient time for interested applicants to apply. Advertisement of an open position shall, at a minimum, be published on the Web site of the district and published in accordance with KRS Chapter 424 at a minimum for a period of twenty-one (21) days.

Bonuses, awards, one (1) time salary adjustments, special salary enhancements, or severance pay for any employee, unless severance pay is provided pursuant to a contract approved by the board, that do not constitute a permanent change in the employee’s compensation shall not be made or awarded to any employee of a district.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 125, § 3; 2017 ch. 33, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

147A.080.
Powers of board of directors.

Each board of directors shall have the power and authority to:

Adopt and have a common seal and alter the same at pleasure;

Sue and be sued;

Adopt bylaws and make rules and regulations for the conduct of its business;

Make and enter into all contracts or agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties;

Provide upon request basic administrative, research, and planning services for any planning and development body located within the district;

Accept, receive, and administer loans, grants, or other funds or gifts from public and private agencies including the Commonwealth and the federal government for the purpose of carrying out the functions of the district;

Expend such funds as may be considered by it to be advisable or necessary in the performance of its duties;

Acquire, hold as may be necessary and convenient, encumber, or dispose of real and personal property, except that no board shall have the power of eminent domain;

Charge fees, rents, and otherwise charge for services provided by the board, except that no board shall have any power to levy taxes;

Enter into interlocal agreements or interstate compacts to the extent authorized by laws of the Commonwealth. An area development district organization shall be deemed a “public agency” as defined by the Interlocal Cooperation Act in KRS Chapter 65;

Promote, organize, and advise special districts or other authorities in accordance with laws of the Commonwealth and act as the regional clearinghouse for such programs and projects as prescribed by federal regulation;

Perform such other and further acts as may be necessary to carry out the duties and responsibilities created by KRS 147A.050 to 147A.120.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 125, § 4; 1978, ch. 384, § 29, effective June 17, 1978.

147A.090.
Duties of board of directors.

Each district board of directors shall have the power, duty, and authority to:

Establish such functional advisory committees as may be necessary and advisable. These functional advisory committees shall be organized to meet such guidelines as may be required for federal or state assistance;

Conduct the necessary research and studies and coordinate and cooperate with all appropriate groups and agencies in order to develop, and adopt and revise, when necessary, a district development plan or series of plans, including, but not limited to, the following districtwide plan elements: goals and objectives; water and sewer; land-use; and open space and recreation. Such plans shall serve as a general guide for public and private actions and decisions to assure the development of public and private property in the most appropriate relationships;

Prepare annually a report of its activities to the cities and counties within the district, the legislature, and the Governor. The board shall make copies of the report available to members of the public within the district;

Comply with the provisions of KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090; and

Cooperate with the Kentucky Mountain Regional Recreation Authority established in KRS 148.0222 for the purpose of establishing, maintaining, and promoting recreational trails to increase economic development, tourism, and outdoor recreation for Kentucky’s residents and visitors, not only in eastern Kentucky but throughout the Commonwealth.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 125, § 5; 2013, ch. 40, § 56, effective March 21, 2013; 2017 ch. 164, § 8, effective June 29, 2017.

147A.100.
Allocation of funds.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, subject to the availability of funds, allocate funds to each district for the purpose of carrying out the district’s responsibilities and for matching federal and local funds.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 125, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(4).

147A.110.
District projects and property exempt from taxation.

As a public body, no area development district board shall be required to pay taxes or assessments upon any project or upon any property acquired or used by it or upon the income or proceeds therefrom.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 125, § 7.

147A.115.
Annual reports of receipt and expenditure of state and federal fundings.

By December 31 of each year beginning in 2017, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet shall, following any year in which the cabinet awarded federal or state funds to an area development district, prepare and submit a detailed report to the Legislative Research Commission and area development district board members. The report shall include the total amount of state and federal funds distributed to each area development district, broken down by funding source and program from the preceding fiscal year.

By December 31 of each year beginning in 2017, each area development district shall, following any year in which the area development district receives state or federal funds, prepare and submit a detailed report to the Legislative Research Commission and area development board members. The report shall include the following financial information from the preceding fiscal year:

For each allocation, distribution, award, or grant of state or federal funds, the total amount, the percentage of the total amount, and a description of the specific types of expenditures made for or allocated to:

Administrative costs;

Direct expenditures; and

Indirect expenditures;

Allocation, distribution, award, or grant funds not expended, and an explanation of why the funds were not expended;

The total amount of reserves carried forward by the area development district, identification of the source of those funds, and an explanation of why the funds are being carried forward; and

For each program:

A list of direct services provided by the district;

A list of service providers contracted by the district and the services provided by those providers;

The number of eligible persons for the program, number of persons served by the program, and, if applicable, number of people on waiting lists for the program; and

The performance measures required by the contract used to evaluate the area development district’s actions.

The Legislative Research Commission shall distribute the report to the appropriate interim joint committees and to the budget review subcommittee that has jurisdiction over the Cabinet for Health Family Services or the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 33, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

147A.116.
Required compliance with laws governing open meetings and records, procurement, a code of ethics, conflicts of interest, whistleblower protections, and compensation.

By January 1, 2018, each area development district and any board, committee, or other organization created by an area development district shall:

Comply with the provisions of KRS 61.870 to 61.884;

Comply with the provisions of KRS 61.800 to 61.850;

Comply with state and federal procurement statutes and administrative regulations, as applicable;

Comply with and be subject to the provisions of KRS 65A.070 by either adopting a code of ethics or abiding by the applicable code of ethics pursuant to KRS 65A.070;

Adopt policies to address conflicts of interest for employees and board members of the area development districts, which shall include a prohibition on employees and board members having any interest, either direct or indirect, in any contract entered into by the area development district or any agency created by the area development district;

Be subject to the provisions of KRS 61.101 to 61.103;

Subject to the provisions of KRS 14A.070(4), adopt, implement, and maintain a detailed and equitable compensation policy for its employees; and

Establish and maintain an independent process to receive, analyze, investigate and resolve concerns relating to the area development district, including alleged violations of the code of ethics or any of the provisions of this section. The process shall include a monthly reporting requirement to the board members of the area development district of any reported concerns or alleged violations. If the process finds a reasonable likelihood that a violation exists, then that alleged violation shall be reported to the Department for Local Government, the Auditor of Public Accounts, and the Attorney General; and

By July 1, 2020, each area development district and any board, committee, or other organization created by an area development district shall provide public access to financial information in compliance with the provisions of KRS 65.312(4).

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 33, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

147A.117.
Contract for audit by certified public accountant or firm instead of the Auditor of Public Accounts — Conditions for.

No area development district shall enter into any contract with a certified public accountant or firm to perform an audit unless the Auditor of Public Accounts has declined in writing to perform the audit or has failed to respond within thirty (30) days of receipt of a written request. The area development district shall furnish the Auditor of Public Accounts with a comprehensive statement of the scope and nature of the proposed audit. The actual expense of an audit performed by the Auditor of Public Accounts shall be billed to the audited area development district.

Any contract with a certified public accountant or firm entered into as a result of the Auditor of Public Accounts either declining to perform the audit or failing to respond within thirty (30) days of receipt of a written request for an audit shall specify the following:

That the certified public accountant shall forward a copy of the audit report and management letters to the Auditor of Public Accounts for review;

That the Auditor of Public Accounts shall have the right to review the certified public accountant or firm’s work papers before and after the release of the audit; and

That after review of the certified public accountant or firm’s work papers, should discrepancies be found, the Auditor of Public Accounts shall notify the audited entity of the discrepancies. If the certified public accountant or firm does not correct these discrepancies prior to the release of the audit, the Auditor of Public Accounts may conduct its own audit to verify the findings of the certified public accountant’s report.

If an audit verifying the findings of the certified public accountant or firm’s report is conducted by the Auditor of Public Accounts, the actual expense of the audit shall be billed to the area development district.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 33, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

147A.120.
Limitation on districts’ functions, powers and duties.

Nothing in KRS 147A.050 to 147A.120 shall be deemed to limit or authorize the limitation in any manner of the functions, powers, or duties of any department or agency of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision. Nor shall anything in KRS 147A.050 to 147A.120 authorize the Finance and Administration Cabinet or an area development district to perform or discharge any powers, duties, or functions now reposed, or which may hereinafter be reposed, by law in the Kentucky Department of Education, local school districts, or other educational institutions.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 125, § 8; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(4).

147A.125.
Regional planning council.

Except as set forth in subsection (8) of this section, each area development district shall establish a regional planning council to act in an advisory capacity on planning matters throughout the district.

The regional planning council shall be composed of one (1) representative from each planning unit in the area development district. Each representative shall be appointed annually by the planning commission of each planning unit in the district. To be eligible for appointment to the council, a person shall be a member of the planning commission, or the planning commission’s professional staff.

At its first regular meeting in each year, the council shall elect from its membership a president and vice president. The vice president shall have the authority to act as president of the council during the absence or disability of the president.

The council shall meet at the call of the president, but at least quarterly in each year.

To insure compatible treatment of planned development throughout the district, the council may review comprehensive plans of planning units within the district for regional impact, may develop regional transportation, infrastructure, and land use plans for the district, and may make recommendations regarding the regional impact of proposed comprehensive plans and plan amendments of planning units within the district.

The area development district shall provide staff and technical support as requested by the council. Existing land use planning services and functions of the area development district shall be placed under the direction and control of the council.

The council may offer training and education opportunities in the area of planning and zoning matters to planning commission members and staff in the district.

The requirements of this section shall not apply to any area development district in which fifty percent (50%) or more of the population resides in cities or counties which participate in a regional planning authority, council of governments, or other agency which is authorized to perform regional planning functions as described in this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 362, § 9, effective July 13, 1990.

147A.130.
Fee to cover administrative costs of health care trusts — Referral fees prohibited. [Repealed.]

147A.140.
District preparation of solid waste management plan.

In addition to its other powers, each area development district may prepare a solid waste management plan emphasizing regional alternatives for reduction, collection, transportation, and disposal for a local government which authorizes the preparation of the plan, but shall not have authority to implement the area plan.

History.
Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 12, § 7, effective February 26, 1991.